New York, session 2025-2026, S1516.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 14 of section 71-0921 of the environmental 2 conservation law, as added by chapter 532 of the laws of 2019, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 14. Violation of [subparagraph one, two or four of paragraph b of 5 subdivision one] subdivision four of section 11-0719 of this chapter 6 involving the revocation and suspension of hunting, trapping, or fishing 7 licenses. Each such misdemeanor shall be punishable by imprisonment for 8 not more than ninety days, or by a fine of not less than five hundred 9 dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, or by both such imprisonment 10 and fine. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01900-01-5